src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON CASE/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND
 ABL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ACC-PXSG1/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ACC-PXSG3/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 APR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 CAR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 CMPR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 CNS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 COM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 DAT/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 EGR/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ELA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 GEN/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 ILL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INE/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 INS/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 NOM/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 PRL/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 TER/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;
 TRA/MORPH-THEN-WORDEND ;



! Removing 2012-02-08 The comparative can be taken care of once
! LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF_COMPARISON
! +Comp:%>джык INTERR-REL ;
!               INTERR-REL ;

LEXICON Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr+Ill: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Tra: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Tra+Egr: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF
+Ter: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;

LEXICON INTERR-REL-INDEF ! 3 types of pronouns are congregated here
 PRON-INDEFTAG ; ! This leads to a variety of indefinite pronouns
 INTERR-REL ; ! This leads to a split between relative and interrogative pronouns

LEXICON INTERR-REL
+Interr: COMPARATIVE ;
+Rel: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEFTAG !SHOULD THIS BE REMOVED 2020-10-13
+Der/кӧ+Indef:%>кӧ K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef:%>сюрӧ K ;
+Der/кӧ+Indef+Err/Dial:%>ке K ;
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef+Err/Dial:%>сюре K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
 
LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG
+Indef: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-KO
+Indef+Sg: PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX ;
+Indef+Pl:%>ъяс PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-KO-CX
+Nom: INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Acc:%>ӧс INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Gen:%>лӧн INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Abl:%>лысь INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Dat:%>лы INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Ins:%>ӧн INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Ela:%>ысь INDEF-IN-KO ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед INDEF-IN-KO ;
+Egr:%>сянь INDEF-IN-KO ;

LEXICON PRONINDEFTAG-SJURO
+Indef: PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-CX ;

LEXICON PRONINDEF-PERS-SJURO-CX
+Nom: INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Acc:%>ӧс INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Gen:%>лӧн INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:%>лэн INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Abl:%>лысь INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Dat:%>лы INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Ins:%>ӧн INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Ela:%>ысь INDEF-IN-SJURO ; !2011-10-19 It might be that this only has to do with мый _what_ and мыйыськӧ _for some reason_
+Com:%>кӧд INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Com+Err/Dial:%>кед INDEF-IN-SJURO ;
+Egr:%>сянь INDEF-IN-SJURO ;


LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-KO
+Der/кӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INDEF-SJURO
+Der/сюрӧ+Indef: K ;

LEXICON IS_PRON-INTERR
+Interr: K ;


!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON-SPAT
!2018-10-21!+Spat: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR
+Recipr: PRON-RECIPR-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIPR-CASE
+Cmpl: WordEnd ; !CHECKME 2019-10-27 is this same as Sg Nom
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыд K ;
+Cmpl+PxSg2:ыс K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl1:ным K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нум K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl2:ныд K ;
+Cmpl+PxPl3:ныс K ;
+Gen:лӧн K ;
+Gen+Err/Dial:лэн K ;
+Abl+PxSg3:ыслысь K ;
+Abl+PxPl3:ныслысь K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Dat+PxSg3:ыслы K ;
+Dat+PxPl3:ныслы K ;
+Acc:%>ӧс K ;
+Acc+PxSg2:тӧ K ;
+Acc+Err/Dial:%>эс K ;
+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Dial:тэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl1:нымӧс K ;
+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Dial:нумес K ;
+Acc+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3:сӧ K ;
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Dial:нытэ K ;
+Acc+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныссэ K ;
+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Dial:сэ K ;

!+Acc2+PxPl2:нытӧ K ;
!+Acc3+PxPl3:ныссӧ K ;
!+Acc3:сӧ K ;
+Com+PxSg3:ыскӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl2:ныдкӧд K ;
+Com+PxPl3:ныскӧд K ;
+Com+PxSg3+Err/Dial:ыскед K ;
+Com+PxPl2+Err/Dial:ныдкед K ;
+Com+PxPl3+Err/Dial:ныскед K ;
+Car+PxSg3:тӧгыс K ;
+Car+PxSg3+Err/Dial:тэгыс K ;
+Ela:ысь K ;
+Ela+PxSg3:сьыс K ;
+Ela+PxPl2:сьыныд K ;
+Ela+PxPl3:сьыныс K ;
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; ! Here is a good problem: Should there be a special tag
                ! for the illative-inessive forms
+Ill+PxPl3:нысӧ K ;
+Ill+PxPl3+Err/Dial:нысэ K ;

+Abl+PxPl2:ныдлысь K ;
+Dat+PxPl2:ныдлы K ;

+Com:кӧд K ;
+Com+Err/Dial:кед K ;
+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Ins+Err/Dial:%>эн K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;


LEXICON PRON-REL
+Rel: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR
+Refl+Der/ладор: Noun1 ; !2011-11-22

LEXICON REFL_AS !! * = @CODE@ ас:а 
+Det+Refl:с ABS_ ; !ас is an absolute-form modifer
+Refl:  REFL_AS-01 ;
+Refl+Ins:сӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
+Refl+Ins+Err/Dial:сэн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3

+Poss+Sg1:слам PRON-POSS  "minun oma -ni" ;
+Poss+Sg2:слад PRON-POSS  "sinun oma -si" ;
+Poss+Sg3:слас PRON-POSS  "hänen oma -nsa/ sen oma" ;
+Poss+Pl1:сланым PRON-POSS  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Poss+Pl1+Err/Dial:сланум PRON-POSS  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Poss+Pl2:сланыд PRON-POSS  "teidän oma -nne" ;
+Poss+Pl3:сланыс PRON-POSS  "heidän oma -nsa/ niiden oma" ;

+Det+Poss+Sg1:слам WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "minun oma -ni" ;
+Det+Poss+Sg2:слад WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "sinun oma -si" ;
+Det+Poss+Sg3:слас WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "hänen oma -nsa/ sen oma" ;
+Det+Poss+Pl1:сланым WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Det+Poss+Pl1+Err/Dial:сланум WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Det+Poss+Pl2:сланыд WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "teidän oma -nne" ;
+Det+Poss+Pl3:сланыс WordEnd-PredMonAdj  "heidän oma -nsa/ niiden oma" ;



LEXICON REFL_AS-01
+Sg1:с PRON-REFL-SG1-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Sg2:с PRON-REFL-SG2-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Sg3:с PRON-REFL-SG3-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl1:с PRON-REFL-PL1-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl2:с PRON-REFL-PL2-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl3:с PRON-REFL-PL3-4-OBL-CASES ;
:с PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES ;

+Sg1:чым PRON-REFL-SG1-4-NOM  "minä itse" ;
+Sg1+Err/Dial:чум PRON-REFL-SG1-4-NOM  "minä itse" ;

+Sg2:сьтӧ PRON-REFL-SG2-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg2+Err/Dial:сьтэ PRON-REFL-SG2-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg2:чыд PRON-REFL-SG2-4-CAR/ELA/NOM  "sinä itse" ;
+Sg3:сьсӧ PRON-REFL-SG3-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg3+Err/Dial:сьсэ PRON-REFL-SG3-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg3:чыс PRON-REFL-SG3-4-NOM  "hän itse" ;

+Pl1:сьным PRON-REFL-PL1-4-NOM  "me itse" ;
+Pl1+Err/Dial:сьнум PRON-REFL-PL1-4-NOM  "me itse" ;
+Pl2:сь PRON-REFL-PL2-4-ACC  "" ;
+Pl2:сьныд PRON-REFL-PL2-4-NOM  "te itse" ;

+Pl3:сь PRON-REFL-PL3-4-ACC  "" ;
+Pl3:сьныс PRON-REFL-PL3-4-NOM  "he/ ne itse" ;

:сладор PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR  "" ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧг K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Com:кӧд K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Cns:ла K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Dat:лым K ;
+Dat+Err/Dial:лум K ;
+Ela:сьым K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьум K ;
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
+Ins:намӧн K ; !CHECKME

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгыд K ; !
+Com:кӧдыд K ; !
+Car+Err/Dial:тэгыд K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кедыд K ; !
+Cns:лаыд K ;
+Cns:ыдла K ;
+Dat:лыд K ;
+Ela:сьыд K ;
+Ine:ад K ;
+Ins:над K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгыс K ; !
+Com:кӧдыс K ; !
+Car+Err/Dial:тэгыс K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кедыс K ; !
+Cns:ысла K ;
+Dat:лыс K ;
+Ela:сьыс K ;
+Ine:ас K ;
+Ins:нас K ;
!+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Sg3, Pl3
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгным K ; !
+Com:кӧдным K ; !
+Dat:лыным K ;
+Ela:сьыным K ;
+Ela:сьынымлысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ela:сьынымысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ins:наным K ;
+Car+Err/Dial:тегнум K ; !
+Com+Err/Dial:кеднум K ; !
+Dat+Err/Dial:лынум K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынум K ;
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынумлысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ela+Err/Dial:сьынумысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ins+Err/Dial:нанум K ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-OBL-CASES
+Car+So/CP:тӧгныд K ; !
+Car+So/PC:ныдтӧг K ; !
+Car+So/CP+Err/Dial:тэгныд K ; !
+Car+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныдтэг K ; !
+Cns:ныдла K ;
+Com+So/CP:кӧдныд K ; !
+Com+So/PC:ныдкӧд K ; !
+Com+So/CP+Err/Dial:кедныд K ; !
+Com+So/PC+Err/Dial:ныдкед K ; !
+Dat:лыныд K ;
+Dat:лыныдлы K ;
+Ela:сьыныд K ;
+Ins:наныд K ;
