src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
ас+Pron:а REFL_AS  "oma" ;
асладор+Pron:асладор PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR  "" ;
кодкӧ+Pron+Indef:код PRONINDEFTAG-KO  "joku" ;
кодсюрӧ+Pron+Indef:код PRONINDEFTAG-SJURO  "joku" ;
коді+Pron:код PRON-REL  "joka" ;
кутшӧм-некутшӧм+Pron+Indef:кутшӧм-некутшӧм PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кутшӧм-сэтшӧм+Pron+Indef:кутшӧм-сэтшӧм PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кутшӧмтор+Pron+Indef:кутшӧмторй PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кыдзи-мый+Pron:кыдзи-мый INTERR-REL  "" ;
кымынкӧ+Adv+Indef:кымынкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "muutama" ;
кымыныськӧ+Adv+Indef:кымыныськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
кыськӧ+Adv+Indef:кыськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostakin" ;
кысянь+Adv:кысянь Egr4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытчаньӧ+Adv:кытчаньӧ EgrIll4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытчӧ+Adv:кытчӧ Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "minne" ;
кытчӧ+Adv+Err/Dial:кыче Ill4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "minne" ;
кытчӧдз+Adv:кытчӧдз Ter4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "kunnes" ;
кытчӧкӧ+Adv+Indef:кытчӧкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jonnekin" ;
кытыськӧ+Adv+Indef:кытыськӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostain" ;
кыті+Adv:кыті Tra4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кытісянь+Adv:кытісянь TraEgr4INTERR-REL-INDEF  "" ;
кӧн-мый+Adv:кӧн-мый INTERR-REL  "" ;
кӧнкӧ+Adv+Indef:кӧнкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jossain" ;
кӧнкӧ-кӧнкӧ+Adv+Indef:кӧнкӧ-кӧнкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыетш+Adv:мыетш INTERR-REL  "minkä verran" ;
мый-нибудь+Pron+Indef:мый-нибудь PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйдакӧ+Adv+Indef:мыйдакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйкӧ+Pron+Indef:мый PRONINDEFTAG-KO  "jokin" ;
мыйлакӧ+Adv+Indef:мыйлакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jostain syystä" ;
мыйтакӧ+Adv+Indef:мыйтакӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "jonkin verran" ;
мыйтӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef:мыйтӧмкӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйя+Adv+Indef:мыйя PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мыйяскӧ+Pron+Indef:мыйяскӧ PRONINDEFTAG  "" ;
мӧда-мӧд+Pron:мӧда-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "" ;
ӧта-мӧд+Pron:ӧта-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "toisensa" ;
ӧти-мӧд+Pron:ӧти-мӧд PRON-RECIPR  "" ;
